Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-323 Future advances. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), for purposes of determining the
priority of a perfected security interest under section 490:9-322(a)(1),
perfection of the security interest dates from the time an advance is made to
the extent that the security interest secures an advance that:

(1) Is made while the security interest is perfected
only:

(A) Under section 490:9-309 when it attaches;
or

(B) Temporarily under section 490:9-312(e),
(f), or (g); and

(2) Is not made pursuant to a commitment entered into
before or while the security interest is perfected by a method other than under
section 490:9-309 or 490:9-312(e), (f), or (g).

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(c), a security interest is subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes
a lien creditor to the extent that the security interest secures an advance
made more than forty-five days after the person becomes a lien creditor unless
the advance is made:

(1) Without knowledge of the lien; or

(2) Pursuant to a commitment entered into without
knowledge of the lien.

(c) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to a
security interest held by a secured party that is a buyer of accounts, chattel
paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(e), a buyer of goods other than a buyer in ordinary course of business takes
free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after
the earlier of:

(1) The time the secured party acquires knowledge of
the buyer's purchase; or

(2) Forty-five days after the purchase.

(e) Subsection (d) does not apply if the
advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the
buyer's purchase and before the expiration of the forty-five-day period.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(g), a lessee of goods, other than a lessee in ordinary course of business,
takes the leasehold interest free of a security interest to the extent that it
secures advances made after the earlier of:

(1) The time the secured party acquires knowledge of
the lease; or

(2) Forty-five days after the lease contract becomes
enforceable.

(g) Subsection (f) does not apply if the
advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the
lease and before the expiration of the forty-five-day period. [L 2000, c 241,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next